Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.290

County airport districts authorized.

The establishment of county airport districts is hereby authorized. Written application for the formation of such a district signed by at least one hundred registered voters, who reside and own real estate in the proposed districts, shall be filed with the board of county commissioners. The board shall immediately transmit the application to the proper registrar of voters for the proposed district who shall check the names, residence, and registration of the signers with the records of his or her office and shall, as soon as possible, certify to said board the number of qualified signers. If the requisite number of signers is so certified, the board shall thereupon place the proposition: "Shall a county airport district be established in the following area: (describing the proposed district)?," upon the ballot for vote of the people of the proposed district at the next election, general or special. If a majority of the voters on such proposition shall vote in favor of the proposition, the board, shall, by resolution, declare the district established. If the requisite number of qualified persons have not signed the application, further signatures may be added and certified until the requisite number have signed and the above procedure shall be thereafter followed.

The area of such district may be the area of the county including incorporated cities and towns, or such portion or portions thereof as the board may determine to be the most feasible for establishing an airport. When established, an airport district shall be a municipality as defined in this chapter and entitled to all the powers conferred by this chapter and exercised by municipal corporations in this state. The airport district is hereby empowered to levy not more than seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the property lying within the said airport district: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Such levy shall not be made unless first approved at any election called for the purpose of voting on such levy.

[ 2010 c 8 s 5001; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 1; 1949 c 194 s 1; 1945 c 182 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 2722-41.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.